Illinois, session 104th, HB2267.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Automated Traffic Control Systems in 5Highway Construction or Maintenance Zones Act is amended by 6changing Section 1 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 7/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Automated Traffic Control Systems in Highway Construction or 10Maintenance Zones Act.11(Source: P.A. 93-947, eff. 8-19-04.)